New Jersey, session 222, A254.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Department of Military and Veterans Affairs shall compile a list of equipment from the National Guard available for lease.  To the extent permitted by federal law, public utilities may lease equipment from the National Guard to respond to damage incurred in the event of an emergency, such as a storm or other disaster, for 48 hours following the conclusion of the event. The Adjutant General shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.